Arkansas, session 2025, HB1365.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-1-703(b)(2)(B)(vii), concerning the
creation and membership of the Arkansas Financial Education Commission, is
amended to read as follows:
(vii) Three (3) members who have various financial
backgrounds, one (1) member of the three (3) to be a female, one (1) member
of the three (3) to be a racial minority, appointed by the Treasurer of
State.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-11-101(c), concerning the membership of
the State Board of Education, is repealed.
(c) The membership of the state board shall reflect the diversity in
general education.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-15-1601(b), concerning the establishment
*JMB179*
04-01-2025 09:54:46 JMB179

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1365
and membership of the Commission on Closing the Achievement Gap in Arkansas,
is amended to read as follows:
(b) The commission shall consist of eleven (11) members representing
the racial and ethnic diversity of Arkansas as follows:
(1)(A) Five (5) persons appointed by the Governor.
(B)(i) One (1) of the Governor's appointees shall be a
representative of business and industry in Arkansas, a representative of
health and human services, or a public school teacher.
(ii)(a) Four (4) of the Governor's appointees
shall be minority or low-income parents concerned about the achievement gap
with one (1) representative from each of the four (4) congressional
districts.
(b) A minimum of two (2) of the individuals
appointed under subdivision (b)(1)(B)(ii)(a) of this section shall be
African-American.
(c) A minimum of one (1) of the individuals
appointed under subdivision (b)(1)(B)(ii)(a) of this section shall be
Hispanic;
(2)(A) Three (3) persons appointed by the President Pro Tempore
of the Senate.
(B)(i) One (1) of the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate's appointees shall be a member of the school of education faculty of
an historically black a college in the state with an accredited school of
education.
(ii) One (1) of the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate's appointees shall be a minority person who has demonstrated a
commitment to education.
(iii) One (1) of the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate's appointees shall be a public school teacher with a special expertise
in closing the achievement gap; and
(3)(A) Three (3) persons appointed by the Speaker of the House
of Representatives.
(B)(i) One (1) of the appointees of the Speaker of the
House of Representatives shall be a person who has experience working with
children from low income low-income families.
(ii) One (1) of the appointees of the Speaker of the
04-01-2025 09:54:46 JMB179

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1365
House of Representatives shall be a minority person who has demonstrated a
commitment to education.
(iii) One (1) of the appointees of the Speaker of
the House of Representatives shall be a public school administrator with a
special expertise in closing the achievement gap.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-15-1603(b)(3), concerning the local task
forces on closing the achievement gap, is amended to read as follows:
(3) Task force members shall be representative of community
demographics, race, ethnic, gender, and socioeconomic diversity. It is
strongly recommended that they include:
(A)(i) Three (3) parents, as selected by the local school
district's parent organization.
(ii) One (1) parent who has a child at an elementary
school, one (1) who has a child at a junior high or middle school, and one
(1) who has a child at a high school;
(B) School administrators, teachers, instructional support
personnel, exceptional children personnel, and second language specialists,
each of whom shall be selected by the superintendent;
(C) One (1) member of the local board of education, as
selected by that board;
(D) One (1) representative of the local department of
social services;
(E) At least one (1) juvenile court counselor;
(F) At least one (1) representative of local law
enforcement;
(G) One (1) representative of the local Communities in
Schools Program, if present in the local school district, as selected by the
executive director of that program;
(H) At least one (1) representative of local businesses,
as selected by the local chamber of commerce;
(I) Representatives from community-based organizations, as
selected by the superintendent upon recommendation from those organizations;
(J) At least one (1) representative of a university school
of education, if there is one in the area, as selected by the chair of the
local board of education;
04-01-2025 09:54:46 JMB179

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1365
(K) Two (2) high school students, as recommended by their
student councils and elected by the chair of the local board of education;
and
(L) Any other community representatives, as selected by
the superintendent.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-15-2502(d)(4)(C), concerning the local
advisory group related to education renewal zones, is repealed.
(C) The membership and staff of local advisory groups
shall be reflective of the diversity of the population of the state.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-61-529(b)(1), concerning the membership
of local community college boards, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1)(A) If the local community college board chooses to become an
appointed board, positions on the board shall become vacant as current terms
expire, and persons who are residents and qualified electors of the community
college district shall be appointed by the Governor for terms of six (6)
years.
(B) To the extent possible, the Governor shall assure
equitable representation on the board with regard to race and geographic
distribution from throughout the district.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 17-19-106(b)(3)(B), concerning the creation
and membership of the Professional Bail Bond Company and Professional Bail
Bondsman Licensing Board, is amended to read as follows:
(B)(i) Each congressional district shall be represented by
at least one (1) member of the board.
(ii) At least one (1) board member shall be an
African-American.
(iii) At least one (1) board member shall be a
female.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 17-22-201(b)(8), concerning the creation
and membership of the State Athletic Commission, is amended to read as
follows:
(8)(A) Furthermore, one (1) of the seven (7) members of the
04-01-2025 09:54:46 JMB179

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1365
commission shall be a member of a minority race.
(B) One (1) of the seven (7) members shall be a senior
citizen.
(C)(B) Four (4) of the seven (7) members shall have
experience with combative sports.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 17-27-201(b), concerning the membership of
the Arkansas Board of Examiners in Counseling, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Appointments shall be made so as to ensure that the Arkansas Board
of Examiners in Counseling consists of citizens of the United States, and
residents of Arkansas, at least one (1) member of each sex, and at least one
(1) member of an ethnic minority.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code §§ 17-80-301 and 17-80-302 are repealed.
17-80-301. Purposes.
The purposes of this subchapter are to:
(1) Provide appointment recommendations for Arkansas state
boards and commissions that license or otherwise regulate health-related
professions to ensure board and commission compositions that reflect the
diversity of the State of Arkansas; and
(2) Ensure that cultural competency, health disparities, and
other minority health issues are adequately represented in the health policy
decisions determined by state health-related agencies, boards, and
commissions for the State of Arkansas.

17-80-302. Minority members of state health-related agencies, boards,
and commissions.
(a) The appointing authorities for state health-related agencies,
boards, and commissions shall consider appointment recommendations submitted
by minority health-related professional associations.
(b) The recommending organizations under this section include without
limitation:
(1) The Arkansas Medical, Dental, and Pharmaceutical
Association;
(2) The Arkansas Association of Black Social Workers, Inc.;
(3) The Arkansas Black Nurses Association;
04-01-2025 09:54:46 JMB179

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1365
(4) The National Association of Hispanic Nurses, Arkansas
Chapter;
(5) The National Pharmacists Association of Arkansas; and
(6) The Arkansas State Board of Nursing.
(c) Recommendations for appointments under this section shall:
(1) Be submitted to the appointing authorities at least thirty
(30) days before the expiration of a position in a state health-related
agency, board, or commission relevant to the field or practice of the
recommending body;
(2) Be submitted to the appointing authorities anytime before
the appointing authority fills a position that has opened due to resignation
or removal before the end of the originally appointed term;
(3) Be submitted by an officially designated officer or
committee on behalf of the recommending organization; and
(4) Include correspondence on official organizational letterhead
and the resume or curriculum vitae of a recommended candidate.
(d) If a recommendation for appointment under subsection (b) of this
section is not received within the time allotted for the appointment, the
appointing authority may make the appointment without a recommendation.
(e) The health-related agencies, boards, and commissions for which
recommendations may be considered under this section include the:
(1) Arkansas Board of Podiatric Medicine;
(2) Arkansas Psychology Board;
(3) Arkansas Social Work Licensing Board;
(4) Arkansas State Board of Dental Examiners;
(5) Arkansas State Medical Board;
(6) Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy;
(7) Board of Examiners in Speech-Language Pathology and
Audiology; and
(8) State Board of Optometry.
(f) This section does not change or affect any existing delineations
for minority appointments.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 17-88-202(b)(1), concerning the creation
and membership of the Arkansas State Occupational Therapy Examining
Committee, is amended to read as follows:
04-01-2025 09:54:46 JMB179

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1365
(b)(1) The committee shall consist of five (5) members appointed by
the Governor subject to confirmation by the Senate for terms of five (5)
years, each of whom is a citizen of the United States and a resident of the
State of Arkansas. One (1) member shall be a member of a minority race.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 17-92-201(a), concerning the membership
and qualifications of the Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy, is amended to
read as follows:
(a) The Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy shall consist of eight (8)
members, appointed by the Governor for terms of six (6) years:
(1) Five (5) Six (6) members shall be experienced pharmacists
who have been actively engaged in the practice of pharmacy for the last five
(5) years immediately preceding their appointments, to be appointed by the
Governor after consulting the Arkansas Pharmacist's Association and subject
to confirmation by the Senate;
(2) One (1) member shall be a minority who is a licensed
practicing pharmacist in this state, to be appointed by the Governor after
consulting the Pharmaceutical Section of the Arkansas Medical, Dental, and
Pharmaceutical Association, Inc., and subject to confirmation by the Senate;
and
(3)(A)(2)(A) Two (2) members of the board shall not be actively
engaged in or retired from the practice of pharmacy. One (1) member shall
represent consumers, and one (1) member shall be sixty (60) years of age or
older and shall represent the elderly. Both shall be appointed from the state
at large, subject to confirmation by the Senate. Both shall be full voting
members but shall not participate in the grading of examinations.
(B) The two (2) positions shall not be held by the same
person.


SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 20-14-508(b)(1), concerning the membership
of the State Interagency Council, is amended to read as follows:
(1) At least twenty percent (20%) of the membership shall
include parents, including minorities, of infants and toddlers with
disabilities, or a child with a disability who is twelve (12) years of age or
younger, with knowledge of or experience with programs for infants and
04-01-2025 09:54:46 JMB179

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1365
toddlers with disabilities, and at least one (1) of the members shall be a
parent of a child who is six (6) years of age or under;

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 20-47-505(a)(2)(B), concerning the
creation and membership of the Child and Adolescent Service System Program
Coordinating Council, is repealed.
(B) A member of an ethnic minority;

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 20-48-203(a)(1), concerning the creation
and membership of the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services, is
amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The Board of Developmental Disabilities Services shall consist
of seven (7) members, at least one (1) of whom shall be a woman, who shall be
citizens and residents of the State of Arkansas and more than twenty-five
(25) years of age.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 20-78-703(b)(7), concerning the membership
of the Rita Rowell Hale Prenatal and Early Childhood Nurse Home Visitation
Program Advisory Council, is amended to read as follows:
(7) Two (2) members from the public at large, at least one (1)
of whom shall be active in child advocacy within the state and one (1) of
whom shall be African-American.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 22-3-303(b)(3), concerning the creation
and membership of the Capitol Zoning District Commission, is amended to read
as follows:
(3) Four (4) resident electors of this state, to be designated
by the Governor and who shall serve three-year terms, one (1) of whom shall
be a black;

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 23-61-1011(b)(7)(A), concerning the
membership of the Health and Economic Outcomes Accountability Oversight
Advisory Panel, is amended to read as follows:
(7)(A) Three (3) community members who represent health,
business, or education, who reflect the broad racial and geographic diversity
in the state, and who have demonstrated a commitment to improving the health
04-01-2025 09:54:46 JMB179

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 HB1365
and welfare of Arkansans, appointed as follows:
(i) One (1) member shall be appointed by and serve
at the will of the Governor;
(ii) One (1) member shall be appointed by and serve
at the will of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate; and
(iii) One (1) member shall be appointed by and serve
at the will of the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 24-7-301(3), concerning the membership of
the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, is amended
to read as follows:
(3) One (1) trustee shall be a minority, as defined under § 1-2-
503, person who:
(A) Is an active or retired member of the system;
(B) Is elected from the active and retired membership of
the system; and
(C) Has at least five (5) years of actual service;

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 26-57-255(a)(3), concerning the creation
and membership of the Arkansas Tobacco Control Board, is amended to read as
follows:
(3) Four (4) members of the board shall be members of the public
at large who are not public employees or officials, at least one (1) of whom
shall be an African-American, and two (2) of whom shall be appointed by the
Governor after consulting the Arkansas Medical Society, Inc., and subject to
confirmation by the Senate.

SECTION 21. DO NOT CODIFY. SEVERABILITY CLAUSE. If any provision of
this act or the application of this act to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of
this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end, the provisions of this act are declared
severable.

/s/K. Brown

04-01-2025 09:54:46 JMB179